California statutes. Penal Code
 limitation, any record related to conduct specified in Section 832.7 by a person designated as a peace officer pursuant to this program, including any administrative record of the tribe specifically related to such conduct.

(3) Adopt and maintain in continuous force tribal law that provides procedures and remedies substantively identical to the Government Claims Act (Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code) for any claim arising from any actions or omissions of a tribal police officer acting as a California peace officer pursuant to this program.

(4) Adopt and maintain in continuous force for no less than three years after the conclusion of the pilot program, tribal law that contains all of the following:

(A) A clear and unequivocal limited waiver of tribal sovereign immunity
 against any suit, liability, and judgment, including the full enforcement of judgments and collections for a peace officer designated pursuant to this program, in connection with any act or omission arising out of the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot program, including, but not limited to, any act or omission by a tribal law enforcement officer exercising, or purporting to exercise, the authority granted by Section 830.83.

(B) An express agreement that the substantive and procedural laws of the State of California or of the United States, as applicable to California peace officers and their employers, shall govern any claim, suit, or regulatory or administrative action, and that the obligations, rights, and remedies shall be determined in accordance with those laws, and by the courts of the State of California or of the federal government, as applicable. This clause does not limit the jurisdiction of the court of a tribe, but the
 qualified entity shall clearly and unequivocally waive any right to require the exhaustion of remedies in a tribal court in connection with this pilot program.

(C) An express acknowledgment of the Attorney General’s inherent authority over the peace officers and law enforcement agencies of the state pursuant to Section 13 of Article V of the California Constitution and a grant of authority over tribal law enforcement agencies to the Attorney General for the duration of the pilot program or later if there is an ongoing inspection, audit, review, or investigation.

(D) An express agreement that the qualified entity and its officers, employees, and other agents shall cooperate with any inspections, audits, and investigations by the Department of Justice or the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training in connection with the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot
 program, including any sanction or discipline imposed by the department or commission, up to and including removal of the qualified entity from the pilot program described in this section. This section shall not limit the Attorney General’s authority pursuant to Section 52.3 of the Civil Code and Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to investigate a tribal law enforcement agency participating in this pilot program or to prosecute any action resulting from their participation.

(E) (i) A requirement for the qualified entity to carry sufficient insurance coverage for the liability of the qualified entity and its officers, employees, and other agents arising out of the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot program.

(ii) The department shall determine, in consultation with the
 qualified entity, the amount of coverage that is sufficient for the requirement in clause (i).

(5) Comply with all applicable provisions of Section 832.5 and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 13500) of Title 4, including all applicable remedies.

(6) Submit all required documentation of compliance with this subdivision to the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, in a manner and form prescribed by the commission.

(7) Submit any data, statistics, reports, or other information requested by the Department of Justice for the monitoring and evaluation of the pilot program to the department in a manner and form prescribed by the department.

(8) Comply with all applicable provisions of Sections 13012, 13020 to 13023, inclusive, 13730, 13777, and
 13519.4 of this code, Sections 7284.6, 12525, 12525.2, and 12525.5 of the Government Code, and any implementing regulations thereof, and all applicable remedies.

(9) Comply with any investigation or review by the Attorney General required under Section 12525.3 of the Government Code.

(10) Adopt and maintain in continuous force a policy prohibiting law enforcement gangs as required by Section 13670.

(11) Adopt and maintain in continuous force an ordinance or other enforceable policy that complies with the requirements of Section 13650.

(e) A qualified entity enrolled in this pilot program may establish a domestic violence death review team as described in, and subject to the applicable provisions of, Sections 11163.3 to 11163.5, inclusive.

(f) When a peace officer authorized under this program issues a citation for a violation of state law, the citation shall require the person cited to appear in the superior court of the county in which the offense was committed, and shall be submitted to the district attorney of that county.

(g) Any criminal charge resulting from a custodial arrest made by, or citation issued by, a peace officer designated pursuant to this program, while exercising the authority granted by Section 830.83, shall be within the jurisdiction of the courts of the State of California.

(h) Any official action taken by a peace officer designated pursuant to this program, while exercising the authority granted by Section 830.83, including, without limitation, any detention, arrest, use of force, citation, release, search, or application for, or
 service of, any warrant, shall be taken in accordance with all laws applicable to a California peace officer employed by a local law enforcement agency.

(i) The sovereign immunity of the state shall not extend to any act or omission arising out of the qualified entity’s participation in this pilot program, including, without limitation, any act or omission by a tribal law enforcement officer exercising, or purporting to exercise, any authority as a California peace officer. It is the intent of the Legislature that such tribal law enforcement officers be similarly situated to California peace officers employed by local law enforcement agencies.

(j) The peace officer authority granted to any person pursuant to this program shall be automatically revoked on July 1, 2029.

(k) (1) The Attorney
 General, in coordination with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, shall provide ongoing monitoring, evaluation, and support for the pilot program. This subdivision does not require the Attorney General or the commission to provide legal representation, advice, or counsel to any program participant.

(2) A qualified entity may terminate their participation in the pilot program at will, however, the requirements of paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of subdivision (d) shall remain in effect.

(3) The Department of Justice, in coordination with the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, may suspend or terminate a qualified entity’s participation in the program for gross misconduct or for willful or persistent failure to comply with the requirements of this article.

(4) (A) (i) By no later than July 1, 2028, the department shall prepare and submit an interim report to the Legislature, the Assembly Select Committee on Native American Affairs, and the Assembly and Senate Public Safety Committees.

(ii) By no later than January 1, 2030, the department shall prepare and submit a final report to the Legislature, the Assembly Select Committee on Native American Affairs, and the Assembly and Senate Public Safety Committees.

(B) The reports required by this section shall include, without limitation, the impacts of the pilot program on case clearance rates, including, without limitation, homicide and missing persons cases, the impact of the pilot program on crime rates on Indian lands and surrounding communities, the impact of the pilot program on recruitment and retention of tribal police, a discussion of feasibility and
 implementation difficulties, and recommendations to the Legislature.

(C) The reports required by this paragraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(l) The Tribal Police Pilot Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. All moneys in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be used to assist Tribal Police Pilot Program participants with fiscal needs associated with the development of information technology, such as the establishment of databases and recordkeeping, necessary for the purposes of complying with any state-mandated reporting required of California law enforcement agencies and employers of peace officers.

(m) This section shall be construed to empower Indian tribes and tribal law enforcement officers to exercise powers conferred by the laws of
 the State of California in a manner consistent with those laws. Such powers are in addition to a tribe’s inherent powers of self-government. This section shall not be construed to infringe upon the sovereignty of any Indian tribe nor their inherent authority to self-govern, including the authority to enact laws that govern their lands.

(n) Participating tribes may enter into an agreement to share liability and collaborate on Missing and Murdered Indigenous Persons cases.

(o) As used in this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Justice or any subdivision thereof to whom the Attorney General has delegated responsibility for the provisions of this section.

(2) “Indian country” has the same meaning as
 provided in Section 1151 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(3) “Qualified entity” means any of the three federally recognized tribes to be selected by the department, provided that those tribes elect to participate. In selecting the tribes, the department shall consider selecting tribes of different sizes from different parts of the state, as well as a tribe’s access to public safety resources.

(4) “Qualified member” means a chief of police who is appointed by, or a person who is regularly employed as a law enforcement, police, or public safety officer or investigator by, a qualified entity, and who meets all of the requirements and qualifications in subdivision (c), and who has been designated by the qualified entity to be a peace officer pursuant to this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 11073.6.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 11073.5.)
-------------------------------------------

11073.5.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 11073.6.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 2.45, comprising Sections 11073 to 11073.6.)
-------------------------------------------

11073.6.

This article shall become operative only upon an appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 21.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 11073.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Criminal Record Dissemination [11075. - 11081.]

11075.

(a) As used in this article, “criminal offender record information” means records and data compiled by criminal justice agencies for purposes of identifying criminal offenders and of maintaining as to each such offender a summary of arrests, pretrial proceedings, the nature and disposition of criminal charges, sentencing, incarceration, rehabilitation, and release.

(b) Such information shall be restricted to that which is recorded as the result of an arrest, detention, or other initiation of criminal proceedings or of any consequent proceedings related thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1437.)
-------------------------------------------

11076.

Criminal offender record information shall be disseminated, whether directly or through any intermediary, only to such agencies as are, or may subsequently be, authorized access to such records by statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1437.)
-------------------------------------------

11077.

The Attorney General is responsible for the security of criminal offender record information. To this end, he or she shall:

(a) Establish regulations to assure the security of criminal offender record information from unauthorized access and disclosures by individuals and public and private agencies at all levels of operation in this state.

(b) Establish regulations to assure that this information is disseminated only in situations in which it is demonstrably required for the performance of an agency’s or official’s functions.

(c) Coordinate these activities with those of any interstate systems for the exchange of criminal offender record information.

(d) Cause to be initiated for employees of all agencies that maintain, receive, or are eligible to maintain or receive, criminal offender record information a continuing educational program in the proper use and control of criminal offender record information.

(e) Establish regulations as he or she finds appropriate to carry out his or her functions under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 470, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11077.1.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2005, and except as provided by subdivision (b), the Department of Justice shall accept fingerprint images and related information to process criminal offender record information requests for employment, licensing, certification, custodial child placement, or adoption purposes, only if those images and related information are electronically transmitted. The department shall continually monitor the statewide availability of electronic transmission sights and work with public and private entities to ensure reasonable availability is maintained.

(b) The department shall, based on the regional unavailability of electronic transmission sites or when departmental processing procedures show a need, accept hard fingerprint cards in order to process criminal offender record information requests for employment, licensing, certification, custodial child placement, or adoption purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 470, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11077.2.

(a) The Attorney General shall establish a communication network that allows the transmission of requests from private service providers in California to the Department of Justice for criminal offender record information for purposes of employment, licensing, certification, custodial child placement or adoption. The communication network shall allow any entity that is approved by the department to connect directly to the department.

(b) Users of the communication network shall undergo initial and remedial training as determined by the department. Failure or refusal to comply with the training requirement shall terminate the connection to the communication network until the training is completed. The scope of the training and the entities’ level of participation shall be determined by the department.

(c) Users of the communication network shall comply with any policy, practice, procedure, or requirement deemed necessary by the department to maintain network security and stability. Failure or refusal to comply shall terminate the connection to the communication network until the department determines that there is satisfactory compliance.

(d) Users of the communication network shall only use hardware and software in relation to or for connection to the communication network that is currently approved and certified by the department, the National Institute of Standards and Technology, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(e) Users of the communication network shall be independently responsible for securing all hardware, software, and telecommunication service or linkage necessary to accomplish connection to the communication network, once they are authorized by the department.

(f) The communication network shall be implemented by July 1, 2004.

(g) Nothing in this section is intended to authorize any entity to access or receive criminal offender record information from the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 470, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

11078.

Each agency holding or receiving criminal offender record information in a computerized system shall maintain, for such period as is found by the Attorney General to be appropriate, a listing of the agencies to which it has released or communicated such information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1437.)
-------------------------------------------

11079.

(a) The Attorney General may conduct inquiries and investigations as he or she finds appropriate to carry out functions under this article. The Attorney General may for this purpose direct any agency, including a tribal court or tribal child welfare agency of a tribe or consortium of tribes that has entered into an agreement with the state pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, that maintains, or has received, or that is eligible to maintain or receive criminal offender records to produce for inspection statistical data, reports, and other information concerning the storage and dissemination of criminal offender record information. Each agency is authorized and directed to provide that data, reports, and other information.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any entity described in subdivision (a) that fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall lose access to criminal offender record information maintained by the Department of Justice until correction of the noncompliance is demonstrated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 583, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

11080.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to affect the right of access of any person or public agency to individual criminal offender record information that is authorized by any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1437.)
-------------------------------------------

11080.5.

A chief of police of a city or the sheriff of a county shall be authorized to request and receive relevant information concerning persons when on parole who are or may be residing or temporarily domiciled in that city or county and who have been convicted of a federal crime which could have been prosecuted as a felony under the penal provisions of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 347, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

11081.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize access of any person or public agency to individual criminal offender record information unless such access is otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1437.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Criminal Identification and Statistics [11100. - 11112.]

11100.

The Attorney General shall provide for the installation of a proper system and file in the office of the bureau, cards containing an outline of the method of operation employed by criminals in the commission of crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

11101.

The Attorney General shall procure from any available source, and file for record and report in the office of the bureau, all descriptions, information, photographs, and measurements of all persons convicted of a felony, or imprisoned for violating any of the military, naval, or criminal laws of the United States, and of all well-known and habitual criminals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1270, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

The department may use the following systems of identification: the Bertillon, the fingerprint system, and any system of measurement that may be adopted by law in the various penal institutions of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice shall establish, implement, and maintain a certification program to process fingerprint-based criminal background clearances on individuals who roll fingerprint impressions, manually or electronically, for non-law-enforcement purposes. Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person shall not roll fingerprints for non-law-enforcement purposes unless certified.

(2) The following persons shall be exempt from this section if they have received training pertaining to applicant fingerprint rolling and have undergone a criminal offender record information background investigation:

(A) Law enforcement personnel and state employees.

(B) Employees of a tribal gaming agency or a tribal gaming operation, provided that the fingerprints are rolled and submitted to the Department of Justice for purposes of compliance with a tribal-state compact.

(3) The department shall not accept fingerprint impressions for non-law-enforcement purposes unless they were rolled by an individual certified or exempted pursuant to this section.

(b) (1) Individuals who roll fingerprint impressions, either manually or electronically, for non-law-enforcement purposes,
 shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the department, for the purpose of obtaining information about the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests or convictions and information about the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the department establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(2) The department shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history information check. The department shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(c) The department shall retain the fingerprint impressions for subsequent arrest notification pursuant to Section 11105.2.

(d) Every individual certified as a fingerprint roller shall meet the following criteria:

(1) Be a legal resident of this state at the time of certification.

(2) Be at least 18 years of age.

(3) Have satisfactorily completed a written application prescribed by the department to determine the fitness of the person to exercise the functions of a fingerprint roller.

(e) Prior to granting a certificate as a fingerprint roller, the department shall determine that the applicant
 possesses the required honesty, credibility, truthfulness, and integrity to fulfill the responsibilities of the position.

(f) (1) The department may refuse to certify any individual as a fingerprint roller, and may revoke or suspend the certification of any fingerprint roller, upon any of the following:

(A) Conviction of a felony offense.

(B) Conviction of any other offense that
 is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a fingerprint roller.

(C) Substantial and material misstatement or omission in the application submitted to the department.

(D) Arrest pending adjudication for a felony.

(E) Arrest pending adjudication for an offense that is substantially related to the
 qualifications, functions, or duties of a fingerprint roller.

(F) Revocation, suspension, restriction, or denial of a professional license, if the revocation, suspension, restriction, or denial was for misconduct, dishonesty, or for any cause
 that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a fingerprint roller.

(G) Failure to discharge fully and faithfully any of the duties or responsibilities required of a fingerprint roller.

(H) When adjudged liable for damages in any suit grounded in
 fraud, misrepresentation, or in violation of the state regulatory laws, or in any suit based upon a failure to discharge fully and faithfully the duties of a fingerprint roller.

(I) Use of false or misleading advertising in which the fingerprint roller has represented that they have duties, rights, or privileges that they do not possess by law.

(J) Commission of any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit with the intent to substantially benefit the fingerprint roller or another, or to substantially injure another.

(K) Failure to submit any remittance payable upon demand by the
 department.

(2) A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction for purposes of this subdivision.

(3) An applicant shall not be denied certification on the basis that the person has been convicted of a crime or on the basis of acts underlying a conviction for a crime, if that person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3, or has been granted clemency or a pardon by a state or federal executive.

(g) (1) The department shall implement regulations to aid in determining whether an offense
 is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a fingerprint roller.

(2) The criteria for determining whether an offense is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a fingerprint roller shall include all of the following:

(A) The nature and gravity of the offense.

(B) The passage of time since the date of the offense.

(C) Whether the applicant has offered credible evidence of rehabilitation.

(3) When
 an applicant with a prior conviction presents evidence of rehabilitation, the department shall not deny certification of an individual as a fingerprint roller based in whole or in part on that conviction without considering the applicant’s evidence of rehabilitation.

(h) The Department of Justice shall work with applicant
 regulatory entities to improve and make more efficient the criminal offender record information request process related to employment, licensing, and certification background investigations.

(i) The Department of Justice may adopt additional regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

(j) The department shall charge a fee sufficient to cover its costs under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 254, Sec. 1.   (AB 3235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.2.

(a) (1) As used in this section, “custodian of records” means the individual designated by an agency as responsible for the security, storage, dissemination, and destruction of the criminal records furnished to the agency and who serves as the primary contact for the Department of Justice for any related issues.

(2) As used in this section, “agency” means any public or private entity that receives criminal history information from the Department of Justice.

(3) As used in this section, “department” means the Department of Justice.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2011, the department shall establish, implement, and maintain a confirmation program to process fingerprint-based criminal record background clearances on individuals designated by agencies as custodians of records. Commencing July 1, 2011, no person shall serve as an agency custodian of records unless confirmed by the department. Criminal justice agency personnel who have undergone a state and federal criminal record background check are exempt from the requirements of this section. The department shall charge a fee of thirty dollars ($30) to cover the costs of the confirmation program in addition to a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the appropriate state and federal level criminal record background check.

(c) Every agency must designate at least one custodian of records.

(1) The agency shall submit to the department the fingerprint images and related information required by the department of the individual designated by the agency to serve as the custodian
 of records for the purpose of obtaining information about the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests or convictions and information about the existence and content of a record of the state or federal arrests for which the department establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(2) The department shall transmit fingerprint images and related information received pursuant to this section to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of obtaining a federal criminal history information check. The department shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation. 

(3) The department shall retain the fingerprint impressions for subsequent arrest notification pursuant
 to Section 11105.2.

(d) Every individual confirmed as a custodian of records shall be at least 18 years of age and shall have completed and submitted a written application prescribed by the department.

(e) Prior to confirming an individual as a custodian of records, the department shall determine that the applicant possesses the required honesty, credibility, truthfulness, and integrity to fulfill the responsibilities of the position. 

(f) The department may refuse to confirm an individual as a custodian of records or revoke or suspend the confirmation of
 a custodian of records if the individual has done any of the following:

(1) Been convicted of a felony offense.

(2) Been convicted of an offense that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a custodian of records.

(3) Made a substantial and material misstatement or omission in the application submitted to the
 department.

(4) Failed to discharge fully and faithfully any of the duties or responsibilities required of a custodian of records.

(5) Been adjudged liable for damages in any suit grounded in fraud, misrepresentation, or in violation of the state regulatory laws, or in any suit based upon a failure to discharge fully and faithfully the duties of a custodian of records.

(6) Committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit.

(7) Failed to submit any remittance payable upon demand by the
 department.

(g) A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction for the purposes of this subdivision.

(h) The agency shall immediately notify the department when the designated custodian of records no longer serves in that capacity.

(i) An applicant
 shall not be denied confirmation on the basis that the person has been convicted of a crime, or on the basis of acts underlying a conviction for a crime, if that person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3, or has been granted clemency or a pardon by a state or federal executive.

(j) (1) The department shall implement regulations to aid in determining whether an offense
 is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a custodian of records.

(2) The criteria for determining whether an offense is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a custodian of records shall include all of the following:

(A) The nature and gravity of the offense.

(B) The
 passage of time since the date of the offense.

(C) Whether the applicant has offered credible evidence of rehabilitation.

(3) If an applicant with a prior conviction presents evidence of rehabilitation, the department shall not deny confirmation based, in whole or in part, on that conviction without considering the applicant’s evidence of rehabilitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 254, Sec. 2.   (AB 3235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

The Attorney General shall keep on file in the office of the bureau a record consisting of duplicates of all measurements, processes, operations, signaletic cards, measurements, and descriptions of all persons confined in penal institutions of the state as far as possible, in accordance with whatever system or systems may be commonly used in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 196, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

The Attorney General shall file all measurements, information and descriptions received and shall make a complete and systematic record and index, providing a method of convenience, consultation, and comparison.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 196, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.

(a) (1) The Department of Justice shall maintain state summary criminal history information.

(2) As used in this section:

(A) “State summary criminal history information” means the master record of information compiled by the Attorney General pertaining to the identification and criminal history of a person, such as name, date of birth, physical description, fingerprints, photographs, dates of arrests, arresting agencies and booking numbers, charges, dispositions, sentencing information, and similar data about the person.

(B) “State summary
 criminal history information” does not refer to records and data compiled by criminal justice agencies other than the Attorney General, nor does it refer to records of complaints to or investigations conducted by, or records of intelligence information or security procedures of, the office of the Attorney General and the Department of Justice.

(b) The Attorney General shall furnish state summary criminal history information to the following, if needed in the course of their duties, provided that when information is furnished to assist an agency, officer, or official of state or local government, a public utility, or any other entity, in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, Chapter 1321 of the Statutes of 1974 and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code shall apply:

(1) The courts of the state.

(2) Peace officers of the state, as defined in Section 830.1, subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 830.2, subdivision (a) of Section 830.3, subdivision (a) of Section 830.31, and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.5.

(3) District attorneys of the state.

(4) Prosecuting city attorneys or city prosecutors of a city within the state.

(5) City attorneys pursuing civil gang injunctions pursuant to Section 186.22a, drug abatement actions pursuant to Section 3479 or 3480 of the Civil Code or Section 11571 of the Health and Safety Code, or a city attorney or county counsel pursuing gun violence restraining orders pursuant
 to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6.

(6) Probation officers of the state.

(7) Parole officers of the state.

(8) A public defender or attorney of record when representing a person in proceedings upon a petition for a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Section 4852.08.

(9) A public defender or attorney of record when representing a person in a criminal case or a juvenile delinquency proceeding, including all appeals and postconviction motions, or a parole, mandatory supervision pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or postrelease community supervision revocation or revocation extension
 proceeding, if the information is requested in the course of representation.

(10) An agency, officer, or official of the state if the state summary criminal history information is required to implement a statute or regulation that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the state summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon that specified criminal conduct. The agency, officer, or official of the state authorized by this paragraph to receive state summary criminal history information may perform state and federal criminal history information checks as provided for in subdivision (u). The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal response to the agency, officer, or official pursuant to subdivision (p).

(11) A city, county, city and county, or governmental district, if access is needed in order to assist that agency in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, and if the access is specifically authorized by the city council, board of supervisors, or governing board of the city, county, or governmental district if the state summary criminal history information is required to implement a statute, ordinance, or regulation that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the state summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon that specified
 criminal conduct. The city, county, city and county, or governmental district authorized by this paragraph may also transmit fingerprint images and related information to the Department of Justice to be transmitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The city, county, city and county, or governmental district shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for an individual who is subject to a state and national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u).

(12) The subject of the state summary criminal history information under procedures established under Article 5 (commencing with Section 11120).

(13) A person or entity when access is expressly authorized by statute if the criminal history information is required to implement a statute or regulation that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the state summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon that specified criminal conduct.

(14) Health officers of a city, county, city and county, or district when in the performance of their official duties enforcing Section 120175 of the Health and Safety Code.

(15) A managing or supervising correctional officer of a county jail or other county correctional facility.

(16) A humane society, or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, for the specific purpose of complying with Section 14502 of the Corporations Code for the appointment of humane officers.

(17) Local child support agencies established by Section 17304 of the Family Code. When a local child support agency closes a support enforcement case containing state summary criminal history information, the agency shall delete or purge from the file and destroy documents or information concerning or arising from offenses for or of which the parent has been arrested, charged, or convicted, other than for offenses related to the parent’s having failed to provide support for minor children, consistent with the requirements of Section 17531 of the Family Code.

(18) County